Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1469
Aircraft; operation while under influence of liquor or drug; third or subsequent offense; penalty.

If a conviction under section 28-1466 is for a third offense or subsequent offense thereafter, the person shall be guilty of a Class IV felony, and the court shall, as part of the judgment of conviction, order such person not to operate any aircraft for any purpose for a period of one year from the date ordered by the court. The order of the court shall be administered upon sentencing, upon final judgment of any appeal or review, or upon the date that any probation is revoked, whichever is later.

Laws 1978, LB 903, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 772, § 3.